Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB603.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4(a) and 5 of the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, are amended to read:Section 4. Remedies.(a) Civil action.--A person who alleges a violation of this act may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction, with a right of trial by jury, for appropriate injunctive relief or damages, or both, within [180 days] two years after the occurrence of the alleged violation.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 5. Enforcement.(a) Relief that may be ordered.--(1) A court or jury, in rendering a judgment in an action brought under this act, shall order, as the court or jury considers appropriate, reinstatement of the employee, the payment of back wages, full reinstatement of fringe benefits and seniority rights, actual damages or any combination of these remedies.(2) A court or jury shall also award the complainant all or a portion of the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees and witness fees, if the complainant prevails in the civil action.(b) Punitive damages.--The complainant may also recover punitive damages if the complainant demonstrates that the defendant engaged in an unlawful retaliatory or discriminatory practice in violation of section 3 with malice or reckless indifference to the rights of the complainant protected under this act.Section 2. The amendment of sections 4(a) and 5 of the act shall not be construed to affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0603PN0611 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223